Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-476
Class V school district; property subject to school tax; management of affairs of district.

All property within the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan class, except such property as now is or may hereafter be exempt by law, shall be subject to taxation for all school purposes. The affairs of the school district created by Chapter 79 shall be conducted exclusively by the board of education except as otherwise provided by Chapter 79.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 3, p. 318;

R.S.1913, § 7009; C.S.1922, § 6640;

C.S.1929, § 79-2703;

R.S.1943, § 79-2703;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 250, p. 775;

Laws 1951, c. 276, § 11, p. 933;

Laws 1959, c. 406, § 1, p. 1368;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1002;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 225;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 49.

Annexation of territory adjacent to metropolitan city did not ipso facto make territory annexed a part of the school district of city. Ratigan v. Davis, 175 Neb. 416, 122 N.W.2d 12 (1963).